Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1013.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Colorado is facing a declared fiscal emergency for the current
state fiscal year, with the office of state planning and budgeting
projecting a deficit of $783 million;
(b) The state's financial condition requires immediate and
responsible action to preserve core services such as education, public
safety, transportation, and health care for documented Colorado citizens;
(c) In times of fiscal crisis, it is necessary and prudent to prioritize
the needs of Colorado citizens and lawfully present residents first,
ensuring that scarce state resources are directed to those who are eligible
for federal cost sharing or otherwise entitled to benefits under state and
federal law;
(d) Current statutes governing the health insurance affordability
enterprise and certain state-only, medicaid-equivalent benefits extend
subsidized health coverage to individuals who are not lawfully present in
the United States, including those who are ineligible for federal medicaid
benefits and federal premium tax credits;
(e) Continuing to provide such subsidies during a budget shortfall
not only diverts tens of millions of dollars annually from legal residents
but also risks policy conflicts that could further endanger federal grant
revenues upon which the state relies for essential programs;
(f) Clarifying statutory eligibility to exclude individuals who are
not lawfully present in the United States will free up significant health
-2- HB25B-1013

insurance affordability cash fund and general fund dollars, which can then
be directed to:
(I) Reduce or prevent premium increases for eligible Coloradans
in the individual health insurance market;
(II) Maintain coverage for lawfully present residents who are at
risk of losing insurance due to 2026 rate increases; and
(III) Preserve core state services threatened by the current fiscal
shortfall; and
(g) Section III.B.2. of executive order D 2025 009 calls for
"adjustments to the Health Insurance Affordability Enterprise (HIAE) to
facilitate a reduction in premium increases and avoid health insurance
coverage loss for those in the individual market and those unable to
purchase through Connect for Health Colorado", and the changes in this
act are directly responsive to this call by making targeted statutory
adjustments to health insurance affordability enterprise revenue
allocations and by ensuring that resources are focused on eligible
Coloradans in compliance with both the scope of the executive order
calling for an extraordinary session of the general assembly and the state's
fiscal priorities.
(2) The general assembly therefore declares that this act is
necessary to maintain fiscal stability, ensure fairness in the allocation of
scarce public resources, protect the state's federal funding streams, and
prioritize the needs of Colorado citizens and lawfully present residents
during an extraordinary budget crisis.
SECTION 2. Legislative intent. (1) It is the intent of the general
assembly that:
(a) All state-administered health coverage subsidy programs
-3- HB25B-1013

funded in whole or in part by the health insurance affordability enterprise,
including the SilverEnhanced savings program under OmniSalud, limit
eligibility to individuals who are lawfully present in the United States, as
defined by applicable immigration law and state law;
(b) All state-administered health coverage programs that are
designed to mirror medicaid benefits but are funded solely from
state-revenue sources, including coverage for children and pregnant
individuals not eligible for medicaid matching funds, limit eligibility to
individuals who meet federal medicaid eligibility requirements, unless
otherwise expressly authorized by federal law or federal regulations;
(c) The phrase "qualified individual", as used in sections
10-16-1203 and 10-16-1205, Colorado Revised Statutes, be interpreted
and applied to exclude individuals who are not lawfully present in the
United States and individuals who are ineligible for federal medicaid or
federal premium tax credits, regardless of prior program rules or
administrative practices;
(d) The savings realized from the exclusion of ineligible
individuals from programs funded by the health insurance affordability
enterprise and from state-only health coverage programs be prioritized
for:
(I) Stabilizing premiums and reducing coverage losses in the
individual market for individuals who are lawfully present in the United
States;
(II) Maintaining coverage for eligible Coloradans during the
projected premium increases for plan year 2026 and beyond; and
(III) Supporting other essential state services that are necessary to
protect the health, safety, and welfare of the people of Colorado;
-4- HB25B-1013

(e) Nothing in this act diminishes or restricts health-care services
to individuals if such services are:
(I) Mandated by federal law regardless of immigration status; or
(II) Provided through private charitable or philanthropic funding
independent of state-administered programs;
(f) State agencies administering health coverage programs take all
necessary steps to ensure program compliance with these eligibility
standards beginning on the effective date of this act, including updating
application processes, eligibility verification systems, program guidance,
and public communications; and
(g) Agencies implement these changes in a manner that minimizes
disruption for lawfully present enrollees and ensures that communications
regarding eligibility determinations are clear, accurate, and accessible to
affected individuals.
(2) It is further the intent of the general assembly that this act be
construed broadly to achieve the fiscal, coverage, and policy goals
described in the legislative declaration and that any ambiguity in
interpretation be resolved in favor of preserving state resources for
citizens and individuals who are lawfully present in the United States
during the current fiscal crisis.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1203, amend
(12) as follows:
10-16-1203. Definitions. As used in this part 12, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(12) (a) "Qualified individual" means an individual regardless of
immigration status, who:
(a) (I) Is a Colorado resident;
-5- HB25B-1013

(b) (II) Has a household income of not more than three hundred
percent of the federal poverty line; and
(c) (III) Is not eligible for MEETS FEDERAL ELIGIBILITY
REQUIREMENTS FOR the premium tax credit, medicaid, medicare, or the
children's basic health plan. except for individuals eligible pursuant to
section 25.5-5-201 (6) or section 25.5-8-109 (7).
(b) "QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL" DOES NOT INCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO DOES NOT HAVE LAWFUL IMMIGRATION STATUS IN THE UNITED
STATES.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-6- HB25B-1013